Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7416.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Earning the rank of Eagle Scout in Scouting America or the Girl Scouts of the USA
Gold Award represents extraordinary achievement in leadership, community service, and personal
development.
(2) These accomplishments align closely with the mission of Rhode Island’s public
institutions of higher education to foster civic engagement, scholarship, and community leadership.
(3) Providing guaranteed admission to recipients of these awards encourages public service
among Rhode Island youth and strengthens connections between the state’s public institutions of
higher education and future student leaders.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
GUARANTEED ADMISSION FOR EAGLE SCOUT AND GOLD AWARD RECIPIENTS
16-117-1. Guaranteed admission for Eagle Scout and Gold Award recipients.
(a) Automatic admission requirement - Public institutions of higher education.
Beginning with applications submitted for the Fall 2026 academic term and every term
thereafter, each public institution of higher education in the State of Rhode Island, including the

University of Rhode Island (URI), Rhode Island College (RIC), and the Community College of
Rhode Island (CCRI), shall grant automatic admission to any applicant who:
(1) Is a resident of the State of Rhode Island at the time of application; and
(2) Has earned:
(i) The rank of Eagle Scout from Scouting America; or
(ii) The Gold Award from the Girl Scouts of the USA; and
(3) Meets all minimum application submission requirements established by the institution.
(b) Verification.
Applicants seeking admission under this section shall provide official documentation of
the Eagle Scout rank or Gold Award to the admissions office of the applicable institution.
(c) Program-specific restrictions.
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall require an institution to admit an applicant into a
specialized, capacity-limited, or accreditation-restricted program (including, but not limited to,
nursing, engineering, pharmacy, or fine arts audition-based programs).
(2) Applicants admitted under this section shall be permitted to enroll in the institution and
may declare any major for which they meet the academic or program prerequisites.
(d) Non-discrimination. Admission granted pursuant to this chapter shall be offered
without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation,
national origin, disability, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
16-117-2. Rulemaking authority.
The council on postsecondary education and each public institution of higher education
may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter,
including procedures for documentation, deadlines, and admission notification.
16-117-3. Construction.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
(1) Guarantee financial aid, tuition waivers, or scholarships;
(2) Alter residency requirements for in-state tuition; or
(3) Prohibit institutions from adopting additional policies that expand access or create
further pathways for admission.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004517/SUB A
========
LC004517/SUB A - Page 2 of 3